Arkansas, session 2025, SB232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-85-303(a), concerning funding for the
Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) For an academic year, the following shall be used to fund Arkansas
Workforce Challenge Scholarships under this subchapter:
(1) Excess funding returned to the Office of the Arkansas
Lottery under § 6-85-212(d)(2)(B)(i) from the previous academic year; and
(2) Net proceeds remaining from the previous academic year after
*CRH049*
03-18-2025 14:03:49 CRH049

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB232
the office:
(A) Transfers transfers the funds requested by the
Division of Higher Education under § 23-115-801(c)(2); and
(B) Deposits the amount necessary to maintain the
Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account under § 23-115-802 in an amount
equal to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000).

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-85-404(b)(1), concerning funding for the
Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) A scholarship under this subchapter shall not be awarded for an
academic year if:
(A) Less less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) is available under subsection (a) of this section; or
(B) The division received a loan from the Scholarship
Shortfall Reserve Trust Account under § 23-115-802 for the Arkansas Academic
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq., for the previous academic
year.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-85-603(b)(1), concerning funding for the
Arkansas Challenge Plus Scholarship, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Arkansas Challenge Plus Scholarships under this subchapter
shall be funded by available net proceeds remaining from the previous
academic year after the Office of the Arkansas Lottery:
(A) Transfers transfers the funds requested by the
division under § 23-115-801(c)(2); and
(B) Deposits the amount necessary to maintain the
Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account under § 23-115-802 in an amount
equal to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000).

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-115-103(14), concerning the definition
of "lottery proceeds" under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(14) “Lottery proceeds” means all revenue derived from the sale
of tickets or shares and all other moneys derived from or in connection with
the operation of a lottery, including without limitation fees, offsets,
reimbursements, interest, insurance proceeds, damages, and liquidated damages
03-18-2025 14:03:49 CRH049

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB232
collected or imposed by the office under this chapter;

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-115-103(21), concerning the definition of
"net proceeds" under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(21)(A) “Net proceeds” means lottery proceeds less:
(A)(i) Operating expenses;
(B)(ii) The amount of fidelity fund revenue under § 23-115-603
that exceeds is required to increase the fidelity fund to five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000);
(C)(iii) The undepreciated amount of capital assets; and amount
of any adjustments required for Multi-State Lottery Association reserves to
meet the Multi-State Lottery Association reserve requirements; and
(iv) The amount of any accrual or other accounting
adjustment that will result in a debit or credit balance in the Office of the
Arkansas Lottery's Unrestricted Net Position account, except for any
restricted net position account.
(D) Accruals that will not result in a cash outflow;
(B) "Net proceeds" includes fidelity fund revenue that
exceeds a fidelity fund balance of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(C) "Net proceeds" shall be based on generally accepted
accounting principles in accordance with § 23-115-206(a)(6);

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-115-103(23)(I), concerning payments to
the Division of Higher Education as a cost under the definition of "operating
expenses" under the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery Act, is repealed.
(I) Payments to the Division of Higher Education to:
(i) Reimburse the division for the costs of
administering scholarship awards funded with net proceeds; and
(ii) Replenish nonlottery state educational
resources expended by the division on scholarship awards otherwise funded
with net proceeds;

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 23-115-206(a)(8)(D)(v), concerning the
statement of revenue, expenses, and changes in net assets portion of the
Office of the Arkansas Lottery's annual comprehensive financial report to the
03-18-2025 14:03:49 CRH049

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB232
Governor and the Legislative Council, is amended to read as follows:
(v) A statement of revenue, expenses, and changes in
net assets for each fiscal year since inception for the last ten (10) fiscal
years of the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery;

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 23-115-206(a)(8)(D)(vii), concerning the
contents of the fiscal year-end report, is amended to read as follows:
(vii) A fiscal year-end report on any information
required to be reported by the office on a monthly basis, including without
limitation:
(a) Unclaimed lottery prize money under § 23-
115-403; and
(b) The Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust
Account under § 23-115-802; and
(c) Minority-owned business and female-owned
business participation under § 23-115-401;

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 23-115-302(b)(9), concerning contents of
the report by the Director of the Office of the Arkansas Lottery to the
Legislative Council, is amended to read as follows:
(9) Annually by November 15, report to the Legislative Council
the following:
(A) For the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(i) The the total amount of net proceeds from the
state lottery; and
(ii) The amounts deposited into and disbursed from
the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account under § 23-115-802; and
(B) The office's projection for net proceeds from the
state lottery for the current fiscal year; and

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 23-115-801(b)(1)(B), concerning the
establishment of the Lottery Scholarship Trust Account, is amended to read as
follows:
(B)(i) The office shall establish the Lottery Scholarship
Trust Account as required under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section to fund
the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq., the
03-18-2025 14:03:49 CRH049

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB232
Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-301 et seq., the
Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-401 et seq., and
any other scholarship funded with net proceeds from the state lottery in a
financial institution into which the office shall transfer:
(a) Excess funding returned to the office
under § 6-85-212(d)(2)(B)(i) from the previous academic year; and
(b) Net proceeds remaining in the Lottery
Scholarship Trust Account from the previous academic year after the office:
(1) Transfers transfers under
subdivision (c)(2) of this section the funds requested by the Division of
Higher Education; and
(2) Deposits the amount necessary into
the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account under § 23-115-802 to
maintain an amount equal to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000).

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 23-115-801(d)(1), concerning findings of
the General Assembly related to lottery proceeds under the Arkansas
Scholarship Lottery Act, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) The General Assembly finds that:
(A) The administration of scholarships with proceeds from
the lottery are expenses of the office; and
(B) Because because the division has the expertise and
experienced staff needed to efficiently and appropriately administer the
scholarships, the office shall use the services of the division to administer
scholarships funded with net proceeds from the lottery.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 23-115-801(d)(3)(C), concerning
reimbursement to the Division of Higher Education by the Office of the
Arkansas Lottery, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(iii) Reimbursement under this subdivision (d)(3)(C)
shall be made from the Lottery Scholarship Trust Account.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 23-115-802 is repealed.
23-115-802. Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account.
(a) The Office of the Arkansas Lottery shall maintain a Scholarship
03-18-2025 14:03:49 CRH049

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB232
Shortfall Reserve Trust Account.
(b)(1) An amount equal to four percent (4%) of the total amount of net
proceeds disbursed during the preceding fiscal year in the form of
scholarships and grants for higher education shall be deposited from lottery
proceeds each year until the amount in the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve
Trust Account equals twenty million dollars ($20,000,000).
(2) Thereafter, only the amount necessary to maintain the
Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account in an amount equal to twenty
million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be deposited into the Scholarship
Shortfall Reserve Trust Account.
(3) Any amount in the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust
Account exceeding twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be considered
net proceeds and shall be deposited annually into one (1) or more trust
accounts at one (1) or more financial institutions by July 1 of each year.
(c)(1)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, if
net proceeds in any year are not sufficient to meet the amount allocated for
scholarships under the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-
85-201 et seq., the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account may be drawn
upon to meet the deficiency according to the procedural requirements
established under subdivision (c)(3)(B) of this section.
(B) In the event that the funding available in the
Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account is not sufficient to meet the
remaining amount allocated for scholarships funded with net proceeds from the
state lottery, up to the first twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) of funds
allocated in the Higher Education Grants Fund Account may be drawn upon to
meet the deficiency.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(3)(B) of this section,
the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account shall not be drawn upon to
fund Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarships under the Arkansas Workforce
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-301 et seq., Arkansas Concurrent
Challenge Scholarships under the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship
Program, § 6-85-401 et seq., or any other scholarship funded with net
proceeds from the state lottery.
(3)(A) Determining the maximum amount of loans from the
Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account to the Arkansas Academic
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et seq., the Arkansas Workforce
03-18-2025 14:03:49 CRH049

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB232
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-301 et seq., or the Arkansas Concurrent
Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-401 et seq., is the prerogative of the
General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by the General Assembly's
delineating such funding allocations for the various scholarship programs,
with the approval of the Administrative Rules Subcommittee of the Legislative
Council and through oversight as required by law by the Lottery Oversight
Subcommittee of the Legislative Council. Further, the General Assembly
determines that the Division of Higher Education may operate more efficiently
with some flexibility, therefore it is both necessary and appropriate that
the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the
Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee as provided by this
section.
(B) If the division determines it is necessary to borrow
from the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust Account to fund scholarships
under the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-201 et
seq., the Arkansas Workforce Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-301 et
seq., or the Arkansas Concurrent Challenge Scholarship Program, § 6-85-401 et
seq., the division shall first obtain review and approval from the
Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint
Budget Committee.

SECTION 14. DO NOT CODIFY. Transfer of funds.
(a) With the elimination of the Scholarship Shortfall Reserve Trust
Account, the twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) currently in the account
shall be first transferred and applied to the Office of the Arkansas
Lottery's Unrestricted Net Position account to reduce the deficit to zero
dollars ($0.00).
(b) Any funds remaining after the transfer under subsection (a) of
this section shall then be transferred to the Lottery Scholarship Trust
Account before December 31, 2025.
(c) The disbursement of funds under this section is a one-time
disbursement.

SECTION 15. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that modifications to accounting
procedures for certain funds of the Office of the Arkansas Lottery are needed
03-18-2025 14:03:49 CRH049

As Engrossed: S2/25/25 S3/11/25 S3/18/25 SB232
to improve the function of the lottery; that improvements in efficiency for
the office are critical to ensure the success of the lottery in Arkansas; and
that this act should become effective at the beginning of the state's fiscal
year so that the office can implement these critical changes. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on July 1, 2025.

/s/Hickey



























03-18-2025 14:03:49 CRH049